src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-totungkve_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (2007: 47)

  Verb - тотуӈкве: # Verb 'translate_me' - full paradigm
    тотуӈкве+V+Inf: тотуӈкве
#    тотнуве: тотнуве
#    тотымэн: тотымэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тотэ̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: тотэгын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тотэ̄гыт
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: XXX
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: тотэгын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тотэ̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тотэгум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тотэгын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотсум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: тотыс
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотсуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: тотсы̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: тотсӯв
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотсыт

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: тотнувум
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: тотнувын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: тотнув
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1: тотнувамен
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2: тотнувын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3: тотнувы̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: тотнувӯв
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: тотнувын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: тотнувыт

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2: тотэн


    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: тотылум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: тотылын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: тотытэ
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: тотылын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: тотытэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: тотылӯв
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: тотылын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: тотыяныл

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: тотыягум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: тотыягын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: тотыяге
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: тотыягмен
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: тотыягын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: тотыяген
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: тотыягӯв
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: тотыягын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: тотыяганыл

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: тотыянум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: тотыян
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: тотыянэ
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: xxx
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: xxx
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: тотыянэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: тотыянӯв
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: тотыяныл

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: тотыслум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: тотыслын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: тотыстэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: тотысламен
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: тотыслын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: тотыстэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: тотыслув
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: тотыслын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: тотсаныл


    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: тотсагум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: тотсагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: тотсаге
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: тотсагмен
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: тотсагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: тотсаген
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: тотсагув
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: тотсагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: [тотсаныл, тотсаганыл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: тотсанум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: тотсан
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: тотсанэ
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: x
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: тотсанэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: тотсанув
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: тотсаныл

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: тотнувлум
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: тотнувлын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: тотнувтэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: тотнувламен
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: тотнувлын
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: тотнувлув
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: тотнувлын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: тотнуваныл

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: тотнувагум
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: тотнувагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: тотнуваге
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: тотнувагмен
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: тотнувагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: тотнуваген
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: тотнувагын
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: x

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: тотнуванум
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: тотнуванын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: тотнуванэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: тотнуванмен
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: тотнуванын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: тотнуванэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: тотнуванув
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: тотнуванын
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: тотнуваныл

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: тотэлн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: тотэлн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: тотэлн

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: тотэгын
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: тотэгын
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: тотэгын

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: тотэн

    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1: тотавем
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3: тотаве
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: тотавемен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: тотавег
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1: тотаве̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3: тотавет


    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1: тотве̄сум
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2: тотве̄сын
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3: тотвес
#    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1: тотвесме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2: тотвесы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3: тотвесы̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1: тотвесӯв
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2: тотвесы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3: тотве̄сыт

#    тотнувев: тотнувев
#    тотнувем: тотнувем
#    тотнувен: тотнувен
#    тотнувет: тотнувет
#    тотыянул: тотыянул
#
#
#    тотнувлэн: тотнувлэн
#    тотсуме̄н: тотсуме̄н
#    тотылумен: тотылумен
#    тотвесемен: тотвесемен
#    тотсанамен: тотсанамен
#    тотыянамен: тотыянамен
